Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.280

Powers and duties of commodity board—Reservation of power to director. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The powers and duties of the board shall be:

(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(2) To advise and counsel the director with respect to the administration and conduct of such marketing agreement or order;

(3) To recommend to the director administrative rules and orders and amendments thereto for the exercise of his or her powers in connection with such agreement or order;

(4) To advise the director upon all assessments provided pursuant to the terms of such agreement or order and upon the collection, deposit, withdrawal, disbursement and paying out of all moneys;

(5) To assist the director in the collection of such necessary information and data as the director may deem necessary in the proper administration of this chapter;

(6) To administer the order or agreement as its administrative board if the director designates it so to do in such order or agreement;

(7) To work cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and national organizations for the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement;

(8) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement. Personal service contracts must comply with *chapter 39.29 RCW;

(9) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement;

(10) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of a board. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(11) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of the board authorized by the marketing order or agreement;

(12) To enter into contracts or agreements for research in the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, use, or distribution of an affected commodity;

(13) To participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized under RCW 42.17A.635, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(14) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from information used to collect assessments under the marketing order or agreement, and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;

(15) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who handle the affected commodity within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the commodity handled for a minimum three-year period by each person; and

(16) To perform such other duties as the director may prescribe in the marketing agreement or order.

Any agreement or order under which the commodity board administers the order or agreement shall (if so requested by the affected producers within the affected area in the proposal or promulgation hearing) contain provisions whereby the director reserves the power to approve or disapprove every order, rule or directive issued by the board, in which event such approval or disapproval shall be based on whether or not the director believes the board's action has been carried out in conformance with the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 103 s 14; 2011 c 60 s 1; 2010 c 8 s 6075; 2002 c 313 s 29; 2001 c 315 s 6; 1985 c 261 s 11; 1961 c 256 s 28.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013. See chapter 39.26 RCW.

(2) This section was amended by 2011 c 60 s 1 and by 2011 c 103 s 14, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

PDFRCW 15.65.280

Powers and duties of commodity board—Reservation of power to director. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The powers and duties of the board shall be:

(1) To elect a chair and such other officers as it deems advisable;

(2) To advise and counsel the director with respect to the administration and conduct of such marketing agreement or order;

(3) To recommend to the director administrative rules and orders and amendments thereto for the exercise of his or her powers in connection with such agreement or order;

(4) To advise the director upon all assessments provided pursuant to the terms of such agreement or order and upon the collection, deposit, withdrawal, disbursement and paying out of all moneys;

(5) To assist the director in the collection of such necessary information and data as the director may deem necessary in the proper administration of this chapter;

(6) To administer the order or agreement as its administrative board if the director designates it so to do in such order or agreement;

(7) To work cooperatively with other local, state, and federal agencies; universities; and national organizations for the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement;

(8) To enter into contracts or interagency agreements with any private or public agency, whether federal, state, or local, to carry out the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement. Personal service contracts must comply with *chapter 39.29 RCW;

(9) To accept and expend or retain any gifts, bequests, contributions, or grants from private persons or private and public agencies to carry out the purposes provided in the board's marketing order or agreement;

(10) To retain in emergent situations the services of private legal counsel to conduct legal actions on behalf of a board. The retention of a private attorney is subject to review by the office of the attorney general;

(11) To engage in appropriate fund-raising activities for the purpose of supporting activities of the board authorized by the marketing order or agreement;

(12) To enter into contracts or agreements for research in the production, irrigation, processing, transportation, marketing, use, or distribution of an affected commodity;

(13) To participate in international, federal, state, and local hearings, meetings, and other proceedings relating to the production, irrigation, manufacture, regulation, transportation, distribution, sale, or use of affected commodities including activities authorized under RCW 29B.50.090, including the reporting of those activities to the public disclosure commission;

(14) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of affected producers that may be compiled from information used to collect assessments under the marketing order or agreement, and data on the value of each producer's production for a minimum three-year period;

(15) To maintain a list of the names and addresses of persons who handle the affected commodity within the affected area and data on the amount and value of the commodity handled for a minimum three-year period by each person; and

(16) To perform such other duties as the director may prescribe in the marketing agreement or order.

Any agreement or order under which the commodity board administers the order or agreement shall (if so requested by the affected producers within the affected area in the proposal or promulgation hearing) contain provisions whereby the director reserves the power to approve or disapprove every order, rule or directive issued by the board, in which event such approval or disapproval shall be based on whether or not the director believes the board's action has been carried out in conformance with the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 164 s 499. Prior: 2011 c 103 s 14; 2011 c 60 s 1; 2010 c 8 s 6075; 2002 c 313 s 29; 2001 c 315 s 6; 1985 c 261 s 11; 1961 c 256 s 28.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 39.29 RCW was repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29. See chapter 39.26 RCW.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.